Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.180

Money laundering reports.

Every licensee and its authorized delegates shall file all reports required by federal currency reporting, recordkeeping, and suspicious transaction reporting requirements with the appropriate federal agency as set forth in 31 U.S.C. Sec. 5311, 31 C.F.R. Part 1022, and other federal and state laws pertaining to money laundering. Every licensee and its authorized delegates shall maintain copies of these reports in its records in compliance with RCW 19.230.170.

[ 2017 c 30 s 14; 2010 c 73 s 8; 2003 c 287 s 20.]